Utah statutes.
40-10-29.   Other enforcement and protection rights unaffected -- Operator
to replace adversely affected water supply of legitimate users.
(1) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as affecting in any way the
right of any person to enforce or protect, under applicable law, his interest
in water resources affected by a surface coal mining operation.
(2)  The operator of a surface coal mine shall replace the water supply of an
owner of interest in real property who obtains all or part of his supply of
water for domestic, agricultural, industrial, or other legitimate use from an
underground or surface source where this supply has been affected by
contamination, diminution, or interruption proximately resulting from the
surface coal mine operation.
